Colorado, session 2026A, HB1150.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of agriculture for
the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado
2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part I as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART I
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
(1) COMMISSIONER'S OFFICE AND ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
Personal Services 3,490,750 1,287,892 2,086,365a 116,493(I)
(22.0 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 5,079,024 1,503,984 3,176,054b 398,986(I)
5,203,331 1,507,390 3,283,325b 412,616(I)
Short-term Disability 21,422 6,973 12,880b 1,569(I)
21,451 12,909b
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 136,554 44,822 81,644b 1a 10,087(I)
136,741 81,831b
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 3,046,536 996,085 1,826,294b 13a 224,144(I)
3,050,692 1,830,450b
Salary Survey 831,950 273,624 496,652b 61,674(I)
Step Pay 142,728 42,557 94,591b 5,580(I)
PERA Direct Distribution 515,620 169,252 346,368b
Shift Differential 56,448 860 55,402b 146a 40(I)
Workers' Compensation 264,452 48,270 216,182b
Operating Expenses1 426,475 173,527 251,998a 950(I)
Legal Services 1,018,672 307,247 711,425b
Administrative Law Judge
Services 10,835 10,835b
Payment to Risk Management
and Property Funds 520,432 315,512 204,920b
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1150

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Vehicle Lease Payments 623,229 310,790 305,630b 6,809(I)
511,453 255,049 250,816b 5,588(I)
Information Technology
Asset Maintenance 42,041 42,041
Leased Space 19,301 19,301b
Office Consolidation COP 529,063 529,063b
Annual Depreciation-Lease
Equivalent Payment 461,617 461,617b
Payments to OIT 3,499,689 2,223,702 1,275,987b
3,306,930 2,101,223 1,205,707b
Digital Trunk Radio
Payments 18,120 11,779 6,341b
CORE Operations 34,321 4,681 25,915b 3,725a
Utilities 240,000 50,000 190,000a
Agrivoltaic Grants 300,000 300,000
Agriculture Management
Fund 2,048,914 2,048,914c
(2.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 204,307 204,307c
23,582,500
23,406,644
a An estimated $2,289,749 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S., and an
estimated $242,499 shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1150

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
b Of these amounts, an estimated $2,702,587 $2,735,300 shall be from the Brand Inspection Fund created in Section 35-41-102 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $1,573,647 $1,569,296 shall
be from the Plant Health, Pest Control, and Environmental Protection Cash Fund created in Section 35-1-106.3 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $608,630 $610,897 shall be from the Colorado
State Fair Authority Cash Fund created in Section 35-65-107 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $606,135 $622,891 shall be from the Agriculture Management Fund created in Section 35-1-106.9,
C.R.S., an estimated $565,282 $566,722 shall be from the Inspection and Consumer Services Cash Fund created in Section 35-1-106.5 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $526,027 $524,972 shall
be from the Agricultural Products Inspection Cash Fund created in Section 35-23-114 (3)(a), C.R.S., an estimated $355,091$353,130 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created
in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $65,536$61,988 shall be from the Pet Animal Care and Facility Fund created in Section 35-80-116, C.R.S., an estimated $12,242(I)
shall be from the Agriculture Value-added Cash Fund created in Section 35-75-205 (1), C.R.S., which amount is included for informational purposes only, an estimated $8,499 shall
be from the Alternative Livestock Farm Cash Fund created in Section 35-41.5-116, C.R.S., an estimated $8,283$7,664(I) shall be from the Colorado Wine Industry Development Fund
created in Section 35-29.5-105 (1), C.R.S., which amount is included for informational purposes only, an estimated $1,050(I) shall be from the Veterinary Vaccine and Service Fund
created in Section 35-50-106 (1), C.R.S., which amount is included for informational purposes only, an estimated $1,475 shall be from the Aquaculture Cash Fund created in Section
35-24.5-111, C.R.S., and an estimated $2,822,617$2,767,524 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
c These amounts shall be from the Agriculture Management Fund created in Section 35-1-106.9, C.R.S.
(2) AGRICULTURAL SERVICES
Animal Industry Division 3,211,508 2,578,653 455,595a 177,260(I)
(21.0 FTE)
Plant Industry Division 7,723,804 653,767 6,268,181b 801,856(I)
(58.3 FTE)
Inspection and Consumer
Services Division 5,584,324 1,391,789 3,792,692c 84,000d 315,843(I)
(47.2 FTE)
Conservation Services
Division2 5,888,733 2,179,513 2,432,916e 450,000f 826,304(I)
(27.0 FTE)
Appropriation to the Noxious
Weed Management Fund 450,000 450,000
Lease Purchase Lab
Equipment 99,360 99,360g
Indirect Cost Assessment 1,582,203 1,263,678g 318,525(I)
24,539,932
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1150

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of this amount, an estimated $336,569(I) shall be from the Veterinary Vaccine and Service Fund created in Section 35-50-106 (1), C.R.S., which amount is included for informational
purposes only, an estimated $58,419 shall be from the Agriculture Management Fund created in Section 35-1-106.9, C.R.S., an estimated $5,000 shall be from the Aquaculture Cash
Fund created in Section 35-24.5-111, C.R.S., an estimated $5,000(I) shall be from the Diseased Livestock Indemnity Fund created in Section 35-50-114 (3), C.R.S., which amount is
included for informational purposes only, an estimated $5,000(I) shall be from the Cervidae Disease Revolving Fund created in Section 35-50-115 (1)(a), C.R.S., which amount is
included for informational purposes only, and an estimated $45,607 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
b Of this amount, an estimated $3,775,244 shall be from the Plant Health, Pest Control, and Environmental Protection Cash Fund created in Section 35-1-106.3 (1), C.R.S., $1,122,463
shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $1,035,220 shall be from the Industrial Hemp Registration Program Cash Fund
created in Section 35-61-106 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $16,124 shall be from the Emergency Invasive Pest Control Fund created in Section 35-1-106.4 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $5,000
shall be from the Seed Potato Cash Fund created in Section 35-27.3-111, C.R.S., and an estimated $314,130 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
c Of this amount, an estimated $3,263,597 shall be from the Inspection and Consumer Services Cash Fund created in Section 35-1-106.5 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $170,000 shall be from
the Plant Health, Pest Control, and Environmental Protection Cash Fund created in Section 35-1-106.3 (1), C.R.S., $169,678 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section
39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and an estimated $189,417 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
d This amount shall be from the Department of Public Health and Environment from the Clean Water Program Costs line item appropriation in the Clean Water Program subdivision
in the Water Quality Control Division.
e Of this amount, an estimated $1,550,025 shall be from the Plant Health, Pest Control, and Environmental Protection Cash Fund created in Section 35-1-106.3 (1), C.R.S., an estimated
$500,000(I) shall be from the Agriculture Value-added Cash Fund created in Section 35-75-205 (1), C.R.S., which amount is included for informational purposes only, an estimated
$235,635 shall be from the Agriculture Management Fund created in Section 35-1-106.9, C.R.S., an estimated $15,000 shall be from the Noxious Weed Management Fund created in
Section 35-5.5-116 (1), C.R.S., and an estimated $132,256 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
f This amount shall be transferred from the appropriation to the Noxious Weed Management Fund line item within this section. This amount shall be from the Noxious Weed Management
Fund created in Section 35-5.5-116 (1), C.R.S.
g Of these amounts, an estimated $399,973 shall be from the Plant Health, Pest Control, and Environmental Protection Cash Fund created in Section 35-1-106.3 (1), C.R.S., an estimated
$372,483 shall be from the Inspection and Consumer Services Cash Fund created in Section 35-1-106.5 (1), C.R.S., $194,279 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in
Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $67,321 shall be from the Industrial Hemp Registration Program Cash Fund created in Section 35-61-106 (1), C.R.S., an estimated
$46,181(I) shall be from the Veterinary Vaccine and Service Fund created in Section 35-50-106 (1), C.R.S., and an estimated $282,801 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
(3) AGRICULTURAL MARKETS DIVISION
(A) Agricultural Markets
Program Costs3 2,271,920 1,311,239 32,451a 928,230(I)
(6.4 FTE)
Wine Promotion Board 574,246 574,246(I)b
(1.5 FTE)
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1150

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Agriculture Workforce
Development Program4, 5 660,261 360,261 300,000c
(1.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 46,157 27,978(I)b 18,179(I)
Community Food Access
Program 172,238 172,238
(2.0 FTE)
3,724,822
a This amount shall be from various sources of cash funds within the Department.
b These amounts shall be from the Colorado Wine Industry Development Fund created in Section 35-29.5-105 (1), C.R.S., which amount is included for informational purposes as the
fund is continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 35-29.5-105 (1), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Agriculture Management Fund created in Section 35-1-106.9, C.R.S.
(B) Agricultural Products Inspection
Program Costs 2,825,876 200,000 2,625,876a
(34.5 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 157,097 157,097a
2,982,973
a These amounts shall be from the Agricultural Products Inspection Cash Fund created in Section 35-23-114 (3)(a), C.R.S.
6,707,795
(4) BRAND BOARD
Brand Inspection 5,920,613 5,920,613a
(59.0 FTE)
Alternative Livestock 15,355 15,355b
Brand Estray Fund 40,000 40,000(I)c
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1150

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Indirect Cost Assessment 281,500 281,500d
6,257,468
a This amount shall be from the Brand Inspection Fund created in Section 35-41-102 (1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Alternative Livestock Farm Cash Fund created in Section 35-41.5-116, C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Estray Fund created in Section 35-41-102 (1), C.R.S., and is included for informational purposes as the fund is continuously appropriated pursuant to
Section 35-41-102 (1), C.R.S.
d Of this amount, an estimated $269,763 shall be from the Brand Inspection Fund created in Section 35-41-102 (1), C.R.S., an estimated $5,593 shall be from the Alternative Livestock
Farm Cash Fund created in Section 35-41.5-116, C.R.S., and an estimated $5,297(I) shall be from the Estray Fund created in Section 35-41-102 (1), C.R.S., which amount is included
for informational purposes only, and an estimated $847 shall be from various sources of cash funds.
(5) COLORADO STATE FAIR
Program Costs 10,469,738 10,469,738a
(26.9 FTE)
FFA and 4H Funding 550,000 250,000 300,000b
State Fair Facilities
Maintenance 429,492 300,000 129,492a
Indirect Cost Assessment 164,006 164,006a
11,613,236
a These amounts shall be from the Colorado State Fair Authority Cash Fund created in Section 35-65-107 (1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
(6) CONSERVATION BOARD
Program Costs 648,957 648,957
734,011 85,054a
(5.2 FTE)
(6.0 FTE)
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1150

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Distributions to Soil
Conservation Districts 483,767 483,767
Matching Grants to Districts 675,000 225,000 450,000a
Salinity Control Grants 506,781 506,781(I)
Appropriation to the
Conservation District Grant
Fund 700,000 700,000b
3,014,505
3,099,559
a Of this amount, an estimated $350,000(I) shall be from the Conservation District Grant Fund created in Section 35-1-106.7 (1), C.R.S., which amount is included for informational
purposes only, and an estimated $100,000 $185,054 shall be from the Agriculture Management Fund created in Section 35-1-106.9, C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Severance Tax Operational Fund created in Section 39-29-109 (2)(b), C.R.S.
(7) DIVISION OF ANIMAL WELFARE
Program Costs 590,801 580,801 10,000a
(3.1 FTE)
Bureau of Animal Protection 494,525 494,525
(4.0 FTE)
Pet Animal Care Facilities
Act 895,722 170,295 725,427b
(11.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 96,978 96,978b
2,078,026
a This amount shall be from the Animal Protection Fund created in Section 35-42-113 (1), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Pet Animal Care and Facility Fund created in Section 35-80-116 (1), C.R.S.
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1150

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
TOTALS PART I
(AGRICULTURE) $77,793,462 $20,564,403 $49,443,501a $3,066,248 $4,719,310b
$77,702,660 $20,389,589 $49,515,104a $4,731,719b
a Of this amount, $1,911,846 $1,911,227 contains an (I) notation.
b This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
1 Department of Agriculture, Commissioner's Office and Administrative Services, Operating Expenses -- It is the General Assembly's intent that $207,099
General Fund of this appropriation be used for the implementation of a Human Resources and Business Operations solution within OnBase. This appropriation
remains available for expenditure until the completion of the project or the close of the 2026-27 state fiscal year, whichever comes first.
2 Department of Agriculture, Agricultural Services, Conservation Services Division -- It is the General Assembly's intent that $500,000 General Fund of this
appropriation be disbursed for grants for renewable energy, energy efficiency, and climate resilience projects. This appropriation remains available until the
close of the 2027-28 state fiscal year.
3 Department of Agriculture, Agricultural Markets Division, Agricultural Markets, Program Costs -- It is the General Assembly's intent that $39,825 General
Fund of this appropriation be used for the International Markets program, and $26,550 General Fund be used for the Colorado Proud program.
4 Department of Agriculture, Agricultural Markets Division, Agricultural Markets, Agriculture Workforce Development Program -- This appropriation remains
available for expenditure until the close of the 2026-27 state fiscal year.
5 Department of Agriculture, Agricultural Markets Division, Agricultural Markets, Agriculture Workforce Development Program - It is the General Assembly's
intent that $64,108 General Fund of this appropriation be used for purposes of the Workforce Development program.
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1150

SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1150